District of Columbia statutes.
38-781.04

Review; appeals.

(a)

The Chancellor shall establish procedures to review retention decisions made pursuant to this chapter or as set forth in the DCMR and may review all retention decisions made pursuant to the procedures.

(b)

The Chancellor shall establish a process, including deadlines, to allow the parent of a student to be retained for failure to meet the promotion criteria specified in the DCMR to appeal the retention decision on the grounds that the student has met the promotion criteria.

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-84, § 205, 61 DCR 178